Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 17

Prohibited Acts

45-2-1701. Unauthorized conduct of banking or fiduciary activity — Violation a criminal offense.

It is unlawful for any person not so authorized to carry on a banking business under this chapter and chapter 1 of this title, falsely and with intent to defraud, to act as a bank, or to represent that the person is or is acting for a bank, or to use an artificial or corporate name that is the name of a bank. The right to receive money on deposit and the right to pay out money on checks are declared to be the exclusive privileges of the banking business.

No trust company hereafter may be incorporated or be qualified to act as a fiduciary unless it is incorporated under this chapter and chapter 1 of this title, or the laws governing national banking associations. The foregoing, however, shall not be deemed to restrict the activity of a foreign bank or trust company acting as a trustee under § 35-50-107; nor shall it be deemed to restrict the fiduciary activity of any other class of regulated financial institutions that may now have, or hereafter acquire, fiduciary powers; provided, that nothing herein shall be construed to increase the powers of other classes of regulated financial institutions.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.601); T.C.A., § 45-1101; Acts 1980, ch. 620, § 4; 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Compiler's Notes. Section 5 of Acts 1980, ch. 620 reads:

“The existence and operation of any trust company formed prior to the effective date of this act shall not be impaired by the enactment of this act.”

Cross-References. Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 23.

Law Reviews.

A Realistic Duty of Care for Outside Bank Directors, 51 Tenn. L. Rev. 569 (1984).

45-2-1702. Receiving deposit, premium payment or investment in failing financial institution.

A person directing or participating in the direction of a financial institution commits an offense who receives or permits the receipt of a deposit, premium payment or investment in the institution knowing that, due to the financial condition of the institution:

It is or will be unable to make payment of the deposit on demand, if it is a deposit ordinarily payable on demand; or

It is about to suspend operations or go into receivership.

It is a defense to prosecution under this section that the person making the deposit, premium payment or investment was adequately informed of the financial condition of the institution.

An offense under this section is a Class E felony.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.602); T.C.A., § 45-1102; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 111, 118.

Sentencing Reform Notes.

Although the penalty provided in this section was purportedly changed to a Class A misdemeanor by Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111, the code commission deems the later amendment of this section by § 118 of that act, which contains Class E felony provisions, to control.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, §§ 32, 58.

45-2-1703. Unlawful service as officer or director — Exceptions at commissioner's discretion.

It is unlawful for any person to serve as an officer or director of a bank who:

Has been convicted of an offense constituting, in the jurisdiction in which the judgment was rendered, a felony involving a violation of banking laws, fraud, embezzlement, or breach of trust;

Would be disqualified by federal law from serving as a director or officer of a federally chartered bank; or

Is indebted to the bank for more than thirty (30) days upon judgment that has become final.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), the commissioner shall have the discretion to approve the application of any person to become a director or officer of a bank chartered under Tennessee law, if the commissioner finds the person has demonstrated fitness to participate in the conduct of the affairs of the bank through evidence of the person's rehabilitation, including, but not limited to, the person's reputation since the person's conviction, the person's age at the time of conviction, and the time that has elapsed since the conviction and other factors as the commissioner determines.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.603); T.C.A., § 45-1103; Acts 2006, ch. 660, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 660, § 6 provided that the act shall not apply to any notice of intention filed on or after May 12, 2006.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-2-1704. Unlawful gratuity or compensation.

It is unlawful for an affiliate of a bank or for an officer, director or employee of a bank or affiliate of a bank to willfully and knowingly and without authority from the board of directors or governing body of the bank or two (2) or more of the active managing officers of the bank to receive, consent to receive, or agree to receive, any commission, emolument, gratuity or reward, or any promise of any commission, emolument, reward, property or thing of value or of personal advantage for procuring, or endeavoring to procure, for any person any loan from, or the purchase or discount of, any paper, note, draft, check or bill of exchange by the bank.

As used in this section, “affiliate” includes:

Any person who holds a majority of the stock of a bank, any other corporation in which the person owns a majority of the stock and any partnership in which the person has an interest;

Any corporation in which the bank or an officer, director, or employee thereof holds a majority of the stock and any partnership in which the person has an interest; and

Any corporation of which a majority of the directors are officers, directors, or employees of the bank or of which officers, directors, trustees or employees constitute a majority of the directors of the bank.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.604); T.C.A., § 45-1104; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Alcoholic beverage commission, receipt of gifts or bribes by members, §57-1-109.

Officers and employees of mental health hospitals or developmental center, receipt of gift or bribe from patient, §33-3-106.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-2-1705. Unlawful concealment of transactions.

It is unlawful for an officer, director, or employee of a bank to conceal or endeavor to conceal any transaction of the bank from any officer, director or employee of the bank or any official or employee of the department to whom it should properly be disclosed.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.605); T.C.A., § 45-1105; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-2-1706. Improper maintenance of accounts — False or deceptive entries and statements.

It is unlawful for an officer, director, employee or agent of a bank to:

Maintain or authorize the maintenance of any account of the bank in a manner that, to the person's knowledge, does not conform to the requirements prescribed by this chapter and chapter 1 of this title or by the commissioner;

Make any false or misleading statement or entry or omit any statement or entry that should be made in any book, account, report or statement of the institution, with intent to deceive; or

Obstruct or endeavor to obstruct a lawful examination of the institution by an officer or employee of the department.

A violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.606); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-1106; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 112.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-2-1707. Payment of penalties and judgments against others.

It is unlawful for a state bank to pay a fine or penalty imposed by law upon any other person or any judgment against the person or to reimburse directly, or indirectly, any person by whom the fine, penalty or judgment has been paid, except in settlement of its own liability or in connection with the acquisition of property against which the judgment is a lien, or as provided in § 45-2-211.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.607); T.C.A., § 45-1107; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-2-1708. Unlawful use of term “safe deposit.”

It is unlawful for any person to use the terms “safe deposit,” “safety deposit,” or other words deceptively similar, in connection with the rental of storage space, or in the title or name under that business is done, except:

A person subject to the jurisdiction of the department;

A manufacturer or dealer in safe deposit facilities or equipment; or

An association, the membership of which is composed of officers or institutions subject to regulation under this chapter and chapter 1 of this title, or the laws of the United States or any state.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.608); T.C.A., § 45-1108; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-2-1709. Unlawful use of banking terms.

It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation, other than those defined in § 45-1-103, to use or employ in any manner the terms bank, banks, or banking in connection with the carrying on or operation of business in this state; provided, that this section shall have no application to national banking associations or existing persons whose name contains these terms. The commissioner of financial institutions may permit, upon application or by rule, the subsidiary of a bank or bank holding company to employ the terms bank, banks, or banking.

Notwithstanding this section, the commissioner may permit, upon application, a person, corporation, partnership or other business entity to employ the term “bank”, “banks”, or “banking” if the commissioner, in the commissioner's discretion, determines that the person, corporation, partnership, or business entity has not or will not mislead the public by employing the terms and the person, corporation, partnership or business does not provide financial services. Upon proper showing, the commissioner may rescind approval if the public welfare so requires. For purposes of this section, any person, corporation, partnership, or business that provides financial services shall include, but not be limited to, insurance companies and agents, money order or exchange companies, investment companies, stock brokers or dealers, mutual funds, industrial loan and thrift companies, credit unions and business and industrial development corporations (BIDCOs).

It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation, other than those defined as a trust institution pursuant to § 45-1-103, to use or employ in any manner the term “trust” in connection with the carrying on or operation of business in this state. This section shall have no application to existing persons as of July 1, 1999, whose name contains the term “trust.” Notwithstanding the above, the commissioner may permit the use of the term “trust” upon application on the same basis as under subdivisions (a)(1)(A) and (B).

It is unlawful for a person to use the trade name or trademark, or a confusingly similar trade name or trademark, of any bank, savings and loan association, savings bank or subsidiary or affiliate of any bank, saving and loan association, saving bank or subsidiary in a solicitation for the offering of services or products if such use is likely to cause confusion, mistake or deception as to the source of origin, affiliation or sponsorship of such products or services; or, to use the trade name or trademark, or confusingly similar trade name or trademark, to that of any bank, savings and loan association, savings bank or subsidiary or affiliate of any bank, saving and loan association, saving bank or subsidiary in any manner in a solicitation for the offering of services or products unless the solicitation clearly and conspicuously states the following in bold-face type on the front page of the solicitation:

The name, address and telephone number of the person making the solicitation;

A statement that the person making the solicitation is not affiliated with the bank, savings and loan association, savings bank or subsidiary or affiliate of any bank, saving and loan association, saving bank or subsidiary; and

A statement that the solicitation is not authorized or sponsored by the bank, savings and loan association, savings bank or subsidiary or affiliate of any bank, saving and loan association, saving bank or subsidiary.

It is unlawful for a person, other than the lender or a person authorized by the lender, to use a loan number, loan amount, or other specific loan information that is not publicly available in a solicitation for the purchase of services or products, unless the solicitation clearly and conspicuously states the following in bold-face type on the front page of the solicitation:

The name, address, and telephone number of the person making the solicitation;

A statement that the person making the solicitation is not affiliated with the bank, savings and loan association, savings bank or subsidiary or affiliate of any bank, saving and loan association, saving bank or subsidiary;

A statement that the solicitation is not authorized or sponsored by the bank, savings and loan association, savings bank or subsidiary or affiliate of any bank, saving and loan association, saving bank or subsidiary; and

A statement that the loan information used was not provided by the bank, savings and loan association, savings bank or subsidiary or affiliate of any bank, saving and loan association, saving bank or subsidiary.

A violation of subdivision (a)(1) is a Class C misdemeanor.

The commissioner or attorney general and reporter in the name of the state is given the power and right by bill of complaint in any court of competent jurisdiction of the parties, to seek injunctive relief to compel compliance by any offending parties with this section.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.609); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-1109; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 759, § 1; 1993, ch. 397, § 1; 1999, ch. 112, § 17; 2003, ch. 31, § 4; 2011, ch. 89, §§ 2, 3.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. §45-2-1709(a)(1)(D) and (E), which regulate commercial speech and prescribe criminal penalties, are constitutional and do not offend either the First Amendment of the United States Constitution or Article I, § 19 of the Tennessee Constitution. OAG 13-54, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 55 (7/11/13).

45-2-1710. Advance notice of bank examination.

If the department notifies a bank of an examination, a department employee who, before the notification of the visitation, gives notice or information to any officer or agent or employee of a bank as to when a bank will be visited for examination commits a criminal offense.

If the department does not notify a bank of an examination, a department employee who, before a visitation, gives notice or information to any officer or agent or employee of a bank as to when a bank will be visited for examination commits a criminal offense.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.610); T.C.A., § 45-1110; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1993, ch. 31, § 2.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-2-1711. False reports.

Any employee of the department who makes a report on oath, as to the result of any examination made by the employee, that is knowingly and willfully false, commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.611); T.C.A., § 45-1111; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-2-1712. False swearing on examination by commissioner or bank examiner.

Any person who willfully and corruptly swears or affirms falsely when being examined under oath by any bank examiner or the commissioner in regard to any material matter or thing commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.612); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-1112; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-2-1713. Disclosing condition of bank, its depositors or debtors.

Any bank examiner or commissioner who knowingly and willfully discloses the condition and affairs of any bank ascertained by an examination as examiner of the bank, or who knowingly and willfully, except to the extent as authorized by this chapter and chapter 1 of this title, reports or gives information as to who are depositors or debtors of a bank where the information is obtained as examiner of the bank, commits a Class C misdemeanor and shall be removed from office; and the fact of the disclosure shall be prima facie evidence that the information was obtained by virtue of the person's office.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.616); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-1113; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Confidential records, §10-7-504.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-2-1714. Director voting to impair capital or other acts detrimental to bank.

Any director of a bank commits a Class B misdemeanor who concurs in any vote or act of the directors of the bank by which it is intended to:

Make a dividend except from the surplus profits arising from the business of the bank;

Divide, withdraw or in any manner pay to the stockholders or any of them any part of the capital stock of the bank, or to reduce the capital stock, except in pursuance of law;

Discount or receive any note, or other evidence of debt in payment of capital stock required to be paid or with intention to provide the means of making the payment;

Receive or discount any note or other evidence of debt with the intent to enable any stockholder to withdraw any part of the money paid in by the stockholder or the stockholder's stock; or

Apply any portion of the funds of the bank except as allowed by law, directly or indirectly, to the purchase of shares of its own stock.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.613); T.C.A., § 45-1114; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 112.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-2-1715. Unlawful increase of capital stock.

Any officer or director of a bank who knowingly and willfully issues, participates in issuing, or concurs in a vote to issue, any increase of its capital stock beyond the amount of the capital stock thereof duly authorized by or in pursuance of law, or who knowingly and willfully sells or agrees to sell, or is interested directly or indirectly in the sale of the shares of stock of the bank, or in any agreement to sell the same, commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.614); T.C.A., § 45-1115; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-2-1716. Appropriation of property, false entries, or refusal to make reports.

Any director, officer, or employee of any bank commits a Class C misdemeanor who:

Knowingly receives or possesses any of the bank's property, otherwise than in payment for a just demand, or with intent to defraud, and omits to make, or causes the omission of, a full and true entry thereof in its books and accounts;

Concurs in omitting to make any material entry in its books or accounts; or

Knowingly by letterhead, newspaper advertisement, or otherwise represents its capital stock to be in excess of the actual capital paid in, or knowingly concurs in making or publishing any written report, exhibit, or statement of its affairs or pecuniary conditions, making any material statement that is false and by which the bank is made to appear in better condition than it really is, or knowingly omits or concurs in omitting any statement required by law.

This section shall not be construed to conflict with § 39-14-103.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.615); T.C.A., § 45-1116; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1996, ch. 675, § 46.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-2-1717. Criminal sanctions for violations — Reports — Confidential information.

It is the duty of the commissioner to submit to the district attorneys general for the respective counties of the state any criminal violation of the banking laws known by the commissioner to have occurred in the county. The commissioner shall also report the violation to the appropriate division of the Tennessee bureau of investigation.

The commissioner may submit to the district attorneys general, to the attorney general and reporter, and to the appropriate division of the Tennessee bureau of investigation any criminal violation of the securities laws known by the commissioner to have occurred.

Confidential information that is communicated by the commissioner pursuant to this section, whether the reporting is required or authorized by law, remains confidential in the hands of the agency to which the information is reported, and does not become a matter of public record by virtue of this communication.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.617); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; modified; T.C.A., § 45-1117; Acts 1984, ch. 632, § 1; 1991, ch. 235, § 4.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Violations indictable without prosecutor, §40-13-104.

45-2-1718. Criminal sanctions for violations.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter and chapter 1, any person responsible for an act or omission expressly declared to be a criminal offense by this chapter and chapter 1 of this title commits:

A Class C misdemeanor; or

If the act or omission was intended to defraud, a Class E felony.

An officer, director, or employee of a bank is responsible for an act or omission of the institution declared to be a criminal offense against this chapter and chapter 1 of this title whenever, knowing that the act or omission is unlawful, the person participates in authorizing, executing, ratifying or concealing the act, or in authorizing or ratifying the omission or, having a duty to take the required action, omits to do so.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter and chapter 1 of this title, it is no defense to a criminal prosecution hereunder that the defendant did not know the facts establishing the criminal character of the act or omission charged, if the defendant could and should have known the facts in the proper performance of the defendant's duty.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.618); T.C.A., § 45-1118; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 38, 113.

Cross-References. Forgery, §39-14-114.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 23.

45-2-1719. Injunction.

Whenever a violation of this chapter and chapter 1 of this title by a bank or an officer, director or employee thereof is threatened or impending and will cause substantial injury to the institution or to the depositors, or stockholders thereof, a court of competent jurisdiction shall, upon the suit of the commissioner, issue an injunction restraining the violation.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.619); T.C.A., § 45-1119.

45-2-1720. False advertising.

It is unlawful for any entity to make, publish, disseminate, circulate, or place before the public, or cause, directly or indirectly, to be made, published, disseminated, circulated or placed before the public, in a newspaper, magazine or other publication, or in the form of a notice, circular, pamphlet, letter or poster or over the internet or any radio or television, or in any other way, an advertisement, announcement or statement containing any assertion, representation, or statement with respect to the sale, distribution, offering for sale or advertising of any loan, refinance, insurance or any other product or service that is untrue, deceptive, misleading, or that uses the name or logo of any other lender without the express written consent of the lender whose name is used. For purposes of this section, “lender” means any bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, trust company, credit union, industrial loan and thrift company, mortgage company, mortgage broker, or any subsidiary or affiliate therof.

Each solicitation to an individual in violation of this section shall be considered a separate act. The commissioner of financial institutions, the commissioner of commerce and insurance, and the attorney general and reporter are entitled to enforce this section against any regulated entity within their jurisdiction or against any other person. The commissioners shall have authority to issue a cease and desist order and to impose a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation.

Any lender whose name or logo is used in violation of this section is entitled to sue for damages, which shall include any actual damages, statutory penalties of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation, and court costs and attorney's fees.

Acts 2006, ch. 801, § 11.